test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-tieudw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - tieudõ: # Verb 28 'eng /est teada/fin' - full paradigm
     tieudõ+V+Inf: tieudõ
     tieudõ+V+Ger: tieudõs
     tieudõ+V+Sup: tīedam
     tieudõ+V+Sup+Ine: tīedamõs
     tieudõ+V+Sup+Ela: tīedamõst
     tieudõ+V+Sup+Tra: tīedamõks
     tieudõ+V+Sup+Abe: tīedamõt
     tieudõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tīedab
     tieudõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tīedat
     tieudõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tīedabõd
     tieudõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tīediz
     tieudõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [tīedizt, tīediztõ]
     tieudõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tīedizt, tīediztõ]
     tieudõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: tieud
     tieudõ+V+Cond+Sg3: tīedaks
     tieudõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: tīeda
     tieudõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: tieudõ
     tieudõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: tīedagid
     tieudõ+V+Jus+Sg3: tīedag
     tieudõ+V+QuoSg3: tīedaji
     tieudõ+V+ActPrfPrc: tieudõn
     tieudõ+V+PssPrfPrc: tieudtõd
